tables/devanagari.cti
# Following needed in backtranslation to override rules in tables which may be included with this table
always \x092D\x0930  45-1235  # BHA + RA - needed to override ® in en-in-g1.ctb table
always \x0916    46    # KHA - needed to override . (period) in en-in-g1.ctb table
always \x091D    356    # JHA - needed to override " (close quotes) in en-in-g1.ctb table
always \x0916\x002C   46-2  # needed to override > (less-than sign) in en-in-g1.ctb table
always \x0916\x092E   46-134  # needed to override µ (micro sign) in en-in-g1.ctb table
always \x0916\x0915   46-13 # to override = (equals sign) in en-in-g1.ctb table
punctuation \x2019 356-3 # to override noback prefix in en-chardefs.cti table
punctuation \x2018 6-236 #  to override noback prefix in en-chardefs.cti table
punctuation ! 235 # to override digit 6 in loweredDigits6Dots.uti table
